West Virginia, session 2026, HB5682.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: That the balance of the funds available for expenditure in the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the Governor’s Office – Civil Contingent Fund, fund 0105, fiscal year 2023, organization 0100, appropriation 85700, be decreased by expiring the amount of $35,000,000 to the unappropriated surplus balance of the State Fund, General Revenue to be available for appropriation during the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026.And, That the total appropriation for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, to fund 0589, fiscal year 2026, organization 0441, be supplemented and amended to read as follows: Title II – Appropriations. Section 1. Appropriations from general revenue. Higher education policy commission 139 – Higher Education Policy Commission –Administration –Control Account(W.V. Code Chapter 18B and 18C)Fund 0589 FY 2026 Org 0441		General	Appro-	Revenue	priation	Fund Personal Services and Employee Benefits			00100	$	2,945,386RHI Program and Site Support – 	RHEP Program Administration (R)			03700		80,000Mental Health Provider Loan Repayment (R)			11301		100,000Current Expenses			13000		1,096,902Current Expenses – Surplus			13099		72,000,000Higher Education Grant Program			16400		40,619,864Tuition Contract Program (R)			16500		1,325,917Underwood-Smith Scholarship Program-Student Awards			16700		1,478,349Facilities Planning and Administration			38600		1,760,254Dual Enrollment Program			42201		5,810,625Higher Education System Initiatives			48801		1,655,725PROMISE Scholarship – Transfer			80000		18,500,000HEAPS Grant Program (R)			86700		5,026,840Health Professionals’ Student Loan Program (R)			86701		547,470Directed Transfer			70000		293,500West Virginia University College of Law			xxxxx		0BRIM Premium			91300		17,817	Total					$	153,258,649		Any unexpended balances remaining in the appropriations for RHI Program and Site Support – RHEP Program Administration (fund 0589, 03700), Mental Health Provider Loan Repayment (fund 0589, appropriation 11301), Tuition Contract Program (fund 0589, appropriation 16500), Fire and EMS Training Program Support – Surplus (fund 0589, appropriation 31099), Dual Enrollment Program (fund 0589, appropriation 42201), Nursing Program Expansion Support – Surplus (fund 0589, appropriation 42299), HEAPS Grant Program (fund 0589, appropriation 86700), and Health Professionals’ Student Loan Program (fund 0589, appropriation 86701) at the close of the fiscal year 2025 are hereby reappropriated for expenditure during the fiscal year 2026.		From the above appropriation for Current Expenses – Surplus (fund 0589, appropriation 13099), $30,000,000 shall be used for Marshall University School of Medicine, $5,000,000 shall be used for West Virginia University Dental School, $32,000,000 shall be used for West Virginia University School of Medicine, and $5,000,000 shall be used for West Virginia School of Osteopathic Medicine for biomedical sciences research expansion. 		The above appropriation for Facilities Planning and Administration (fund 0589, appropriation 38600) is for operational expenses of the West Virginia Regional Technology Park between construction and full occupancy.		The above appropriation for Higher Education Grant Program (fund 0589, appropriation 16400) shall be transferred to the Higher Education Grant Fund (fund 4933) established by W.V. Code §18C-5-3.		The above appropriation for Underwood-Smith Scholarship Program - Student Awards (fund 0589, appropriation 16700) shall be transferred to the Underwood-Smith Teaching Scholars Program Fund (fund 4922) established by W.V. Code §18C-4-1.		The above appropriation for Directed Transfer (fund 0589, appropriation 70000) shall be transferred to the Military College Advisory Council Fund (fund XXXX).		The above appropriation for PROMISE Scholarship-Transfer (fund 0589, appropriation 80000) shall be transferred to the PROMISE Scholarship Fund (fund 4296) established by W.V. Code §18C-7-7.		The above appropriation for Dual Enrollment Program (fund 0589, appropriation 42201) shall be used for the Dual Enrollment Program established by House Bill 2005 during the 2023 Regular Session. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home